pt-BR: Regata estilo das costas: Assimétrico; Reto clássico; Cruzado; Costas com recortes; Frente única; Um ombro; Costas nuas; Costas nadador; Costas em T; Costas em Y; Outro
ko: 탱크탑 등판 형태: 비대칭; 클래식 스트레이트; 크리스크로스; 컷아웃 백; 홀터; 원숄더; 오픈 백; 레이서백; T 백; Y 백; 기타
tr: Atlet sırt stili: Asimetrik; Klasik düz; Çapraz; Pencere dekolteli sırt; Boyundan bağlamalı; Tek omuz; Açık sırt; Yüzücü sırtı; T sırt; Y sırt; Diğer
vi: Kiểu lưng áo tank top: Bất đối xứng; Thẳng cổ điển; Bắt chéo; Khoét lưng; Yếm; Lệch vai; Hở lưng; Lưng chéo thể thao; Lưng chữ T; Lưng chữ Y; Khác
pl: Wykończenie pleców koszulki na ramiączkach: Asymetryczny; Klasyczny prosty; Skrzyżowany na plecach; Wycięte plecy; Wiązany na szyi (halter); Na jedno ramię; Odkryte plecy; Bokserski (racerback); Plecy w kształcie litery T; Plecy w kształcie litery Y; Inny
de: Rückenform des Tanktops: Asymmetrisch; Klassisch gerade; Überkreuzt; Cut-out-Rücken; Neckholder; One-Shoulder; Rückenfrei; Racerback; T-Back; Y-Back; Sonstige
en: Tank top back style: Asymmetric; Classic straight; Criss-cross; Cut-out back; Halter; One-shoulder; Open back; Racerback; T-back; Y-back; Other
nl: Tanktop rugstijl: Asymmetrisch; Klassiek recht; Kruislings; Opengewerkte rug; Halter; One-shoulder; Open rug; Racerback; T-back; Y-back; Overig
ru: Стиль спинки майки: Асимметричная; Классическая прямая; Перекрёстная; С вырезом на спине; Халтер; На одно плечо; Открытая спина; Борцовка; Т-образная; Y-образная; Другое
hu: Triko hátkivágásának stílusa: Aszimmetrikus; Klasszikus egyenes; Keresztpántos; Kivágott hátú; Nyakba kötős; Félvállas; Nyitott hátú; Birkózóhátú; T-hátú; Y-hátú; Egyéb
sl-SI: Stil hrbtnega dela majice brez rokavov: Asimetrično; Klasično ravno; Prekrižano; Izrez na hrbtu; Za okoli vratu; Na eno ramo; Odprt hrbet; Športni hrbet; T-hrbet; Y-hrbet; Drugo
el: Στυλ αμάνικης μπλούζας με πλάτη: Ασύμμετρη; Κλασική ίσια; Σταυρωτή; Με άνοιγμα; Εξώπλατη (Halter); Με έναν ώμο; Ανοιχτή πλάτη; Αθλητική πλάτη (Racerback); Πλάτη σε σχήμα Τ; Πλάτη σε σχήμα Y; Άλλο
hr-HR: Stil leđa majice bez rukava: Asimetrično; Klasično ravno; Unakrsno; S prorezima; Oko vrata; Na jedno rame; Otvorena leđa; Sportski izrez; T-oblik; Y-oblik; Ostalo
zh-TW: 背心背部樣式: 不對稱; 經典直式; 交叉; 挖背設計; 繞頸; 單肩; 露背; 工字背; T 型背; Y 型背; 其他
sk-SK: Strih zadnej časti tielka: Asymetrický; Klasický rovný; Prekrížený; S výrezom na chrbte; Okolo krku; Na jedno rameno; Odhalený chrbát; Športový chrbát; T-chrbát; Y-chrbát; Iné
zh-CN: 背心后背款式: 不对称设计; 经典直排式; 交叉设计; 露背设计; 挂脖式; 单肩式; 大露背; 工字背; T 字背; Y 字背; 其他
sv: Linne – ryggdesign: Asymmetrisk; Klassisk rak; Korsad; Utskuren rygg; Halterneck; En axel; Öppen rygg; Brottarrygg; T-rygg; Y-rygg; Annat
ro-RO: Stil de spate pentru maiou: Asimetric; Drept clasic; Încrucișat; Spate decupat; Halter; Pe un umăr; Spate gol; Racerback; Spate în T; Spate în Y; Altele
th: เสื้อกล้ามแบบเปิดหลัง: อสมมาตร; ทรงตรงคลาสสิก; ไขว้หลัง; เว้าหลัง; คล้องคอ; ไหล่เดี่ยว; เปิดหลัง; เว้าหลังลึก; หลังรูปตัว T; หลังรูปตัว Y; อื่นๆ
nb: Singlet-ryggstil: Asymmetrisk; Klassisk rett; Kryssende; Åpen rygg; Halterneck; Én skulder; Åpen rygg; Bryterygg; T-rygg; Y-rygg; Annet
cs: Styl tílka zezadu: Asymetrická; Klasická rovná; Překřížená; Prostřižená záda; Za krk; Na jedno rameno; Otevřená záda; Sportovní záda; Záda do T; Záda do Y; Jiné
lt-LT: Marškinėlių be rankovių nugaros tipas: Asimetriška; Klasikinė tiesi; Kryžiuota; Su iškirpte; Surišama ant kaklo; Ant vieno peties; Atvira nugara; Sportinė; T formos; Y formos; Kita
ja: タンクトップ背面スタイル: アシンメトリー; クラシックストレート; クリスクロス; カットアウトバック; ホルター; ワンショルダー; オープンバック; レーサーバック; Tバック; Yバック; その他
pt-PT: Estilo das costas da camisola de alças: Assimétrico; Reto clássico; Cruzado; Costas com aberturas; Halter; Um ombro; Costas abertas; Costas à nadador; Costas em T; Costas em Y; Outro
da: Rygstil for tanktop: Asymmetrisk; Klassisk lige; Krydsryg; Udskæring på ryggen; Halterneck; One-shoulder; Åben ryg; Bryderryg; T-ryg; Y-ryg; Andet
fr: Forme du dos du débardeur: Asymétrique; Droit classique; Croisé; Dos découpé; Dos nu; Une épaule; Dos ouvert; Dos nageur; Dos en T; Dos en Y; Autre
fi: Hihattoman topin selkäosan malli: Epäsymmetrinen; Klassinen suora; Ristiin menevä; Leikkaukset selässä; Niskalenkki; Yksiolkaiminen; Avoin selkä; Painijanselkä; T-selkä; Y-selkä; Muu
it: Stile della schiena della canotta: Asimmetrico; Classico dritto; Incrociato; Con aperture sulla schiena; Allacciato al collo; Monospalla; Schiena scoperta; Dorso a vogatore; Dorso a T; Dorso a Y; Altro
es: Estilo de camiseta sin mangas: Asimétrico; Recto clásico; Cruzado; Espalda con aberturas; Halter; Un hombro; Espalda abierta; Espalda deportiva; Espalda en T; Espalda en Y; Otro
bg-BG: Стил на гърба на потника: Асиметричен; Класически прав; Кръстосан; Изрязан гръб; Около врата; С едно рамо; Гол гръб; Спортен гръб; Т-образен гръб; Y-образен гръб; Друго